Maine, session 132, LD1293.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12002 is enacted to read:
§12002. Coyote-killing contests prohibited
1. "Coyote-killing contest" defined. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise indicates, "coyote-killing contest" means an organized or sponsored competition
with the objective of killing coyotes for prizes or entertainment.
2. Coyote-killing contests prohibited. A person may not:
A. Arrange, cause, hold, organize, plan or sponsor a coyote-killing contest;
B. Provide the venue for a coyote-killing contest;
C. Entice a person to knowingly take part in a coyote-killing contest; or
D. Knowingly take part in a coyote-killing contest.
A person who violates this subsection commits a Class E crime.
3. Defense of person or property and sanctioned culling. This section may not be
construed to prohibit a person from protecting a person or property or a municipal, county
or state employee's sanctioned culling of coyotes.